California, session 20252026, AB1706.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33353.2 is added to the Education Code, to read:33353.2. (a) The California Interscholastic Federation shall establish a five-year pilot program that sanctions flag football as an interscholastic sport governed by the California Interscholastic Federation. This pilot program shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following components: (1) The pilot program shall operate from the 2027–28 academic year through the 2031–32 academic year.(2) The pilot program shall be available to high school boys who are enrolled in the California Interscholastic Federation’s member schools in the Counties of Orange and Riverside.(b) The California Interscholastic Federation shall adopt bylaws to implement this section.(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2032, and, as of January 1, 2033, is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique need to pilot boys’ flag football as a high school sport governed by the California Interscholastic Federation in the Counties of Orange and Riverside.SECTION 1.Section 1500 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:1500.(a)There is in the Transportation Agency the Department of Motor Vehicles.(b)Whenever the term “Business, Transportation and Housing Agency” appears in this code, it refers to the Transportation Agency, and whenever the term “Secretary of Business, Transportation and Housing” appears in this code, it refers to the Secretary of Transportation.